Massachusetts, session 194th, H5346.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding sections 17 and 17B of chapter 138 of the General
Laws, the licensing authority of the city of Westfield may convert 1 seasonal license for the sale
of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises under section 15 of said chapter 138,
currently issued to SHIVA LAXMI INC, d/b/a Pleasant Street Market, located at 54 Pleasant
Street to an annual license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises
under said section 15 of said chapter 138 to SHIVA LAXMI INC, d/b/a Pleasant Street Market,
located at 54 Pleasant Street. The license converted under this section shall be subject to all of
said chapter 138 except said sections 17 and 17B.
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license converted under
this section to any other location but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in
of 2

good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees, and contributions have
been paid.
(c) If the licensee terminates or fails to renew a license converted under this section or
any such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all
of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the
licensing authority may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant
at the same location under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license
shall dissolve.
SECTION 2. Upon the issuance of the license authorized in section 1, the licensee shall
return physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the
licensing authority, its license for the sale of wine and malt beverages not to be drunk on the
premises under section 15 of chapter 138.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2